New York, session 2025-2026, A10233.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Center for Autoimmune and Blood Disorder Research. 1. 2 There shall be established a Center for Autoimmune and Blood Disorder 3 Research (CABDR) at the SUNY Downstate Medical Center. The CABDR shall 4 allow for collaborations amongst medical professionals to provide 5 insights and approaches to understanding autoimmune and blood disorder 6 diseases and improving treatment methods. The CABDR shall specialize in 7 research on, but not limited to, sickle cell disease, lupus, and celiac. 8 2. The CABDR shall conduct, but not limited to, basic and clinical, 9 social, translation, technological, epidemiological and behavioral 10 research on autoimmune and blood disorder diseases. 11 3. There shall be an administrative director responsible for coordi- 12 nating the research activities amongst the medical professionals as well 13 as preparing and submitting grants. 14 4. In addition to the funding received pursuant to this act, the CABDR 15 shall apply for funding through philanthropic sources earmarked for the 16 development of new treatment methods at SUNY Downstate Medical Center. 17 5. Funds appropriated pursuant to this act shall be administered 18 through the SUNY Downstate Medical Center finance division, specifically 19 the office of research administration. 20 § 2. The sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), or so much 21 thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the Center for 22 Autoimmune and Blood Disorder Research out of any moneys in the state 23 treasury in the general fund to the credit of the state purposes 24 account, not otherwise appropriated, and made immediately available, for 25 the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this act. Such moneys 26 shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the comptroller on vouchers 27 certified or approved by the commissioner of health in the manner 28 prescribed by law. 29 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10564-01-5